West Virginia, session 2026, HB4679.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: Chapter 7. county commissions and officers. article 28. impermissible lobbying. §7-28-1. Ban on taxpayer-funded lobbying at state level. No county commission may use monies from taxes collected to pay for the services of a lobbyist to represent the county at the state level. Chapter 7A. consolidated Local Government. article 9. impermissible lobbying. §7A-9-1. Ban on taxpayer-funded lobbying at state level. No governing body of any consolidated local government may use monies from taxes collected to pay for the services of a lobbyist to represent the consolidated local government at the state level. Chapter 8. municipal corporations. article 40. impermissible lobbying. §8-40-1. Ban on taxpayer-funded lobbying at state level. No governing body of any municipality, town, village, city, or other municipal corporation may use monies from taxes collected to pay for the services of a lobbyist to represent the municipal corporation at the state level.